California, session 20252026, AB1224.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California’s public education system continues to experience teacher shortages, particularly in high-need subject areas and schools serving low-income pupils, English learners, and pupils with disabilities.(b) (1) In recent years, the state has sustained the number of pathways available to help local educational agencies fill classrooms when fully credentialed teachers are not available, including, but not limited to, the short-term staff permit, provisional internship permit, teaching permit for statutory leave, emergency career substitute permit, and internship programs.(2) These pathways generally require evidence of recruitment efforts, governing board approval, and some form of professional preparation, support, or training which reflects California’s longstanding commitment to ensuring that flexibility in staffing is accompanied by safeguards for instructional quality.(c) The Legislature affirms that the long-term solution to staffing shortages must be a sustained commitment to fully credentialed, appropriately assigned teachers in every classroom.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the flexibility provided by this act that allows substitute teachers to serve up to 60 cumulative days per assignment be used only as a stopgap in rare circumstances where a higher quality option is not viable or not immediately available.(e) It is further the intent of the Legislature that this temporary policy be accompanied by a focused effort from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to review its regulations to determine whether existing substitute permit options, such as the teaching permit for statutory leave and the emergency career substitute permit, could be made more flexible, accessible, or responsive to local educational agency needs, while maintaining appropriate safeguards for instructional quality and equity. The Legislature affirms that the commission already has the authority under existing law to make any regulatory changes deemed appropriate as a result of this review.(f) This act is not intended to replace or diminish California’s commitment to educator quality, but to provide limited, time-bound flexibility while the state strengthens and modernizes the substitute permitting framework.SEC. 2. Section 44303 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44302, to read:44303. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a local educational agency complies with subdivision (b) or has entered into a collective bargaining agreement with the employee organization that includes a specific process for the assignment of substitute teachers, any holder of a credential or permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that authorizes the holder to substitute teach in a general, special, or career technical education assignment may serve in a substitute teaching assignment aligned with their authorization, including for staff vacancies, for up to 60 cumulative days for any one assignment in the local educational agency.(b) Before using the authorization pursuant to subdivision (a), a local educational agency that has not entered into a collective bargaining agreement with the employee organization that includes a specific process for the assignment of substitute teachers shall do either or both of the following, as applicable:(1) If the substitute will serve in a position in which the teacher on record is currently on statutory leave, employ all available and suitable substitute teachers who hold a teaching permit for statutory leave, as described in Section 80022 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) For assignments in vacant positions, or where the use of a teaching permit for statutory leave is not allowed under existing law, make reasonable efforts to recruit an individual for the assignment pursuant to Section 44225.7.(c) Before assigning a substitute teacher pursuant to the authority provided in this section for more than 20 cumulative days in a special education assignment or 30 cumulative days in any one assignment, a school district or charter school shall do either of the following, as applicable:(1) If the assignment is foreseeable, obtain approval from the governing board or body at a regularly scheduled public meeting. The item shall include the schoolsite and assignment details, the anticipated duration, and a statement that the assignment is being made under the authority of this section.(2) If the assignment is unforeseeable due to urgent circumstances, the school district or charter school shall provide the information described in paragraph (1) as an informational item at the next regularly scheduled public meeting of the governing board or body. This informational item shall also include a brief explanation of the unforeseen circumstances that prevented advance approval pursuant to paragraph (1).(d) Each county superintendent of schools shall, on a quarterly basis, report to the respective county board of education at a regularly scheduled meeting held in accordance with public notification requirements the total number of substitute teachers employed by the county superintendent of schools who served during the prior quarter for more than 20 cumulative days in a special education assignment or 30 cumulative days in any one assignment pursuant to this section.(e) (1) If a local educational agency assigns a substitute teacher pursuant to the authority provided in this section and the substitute teacher does not have a preliminary or professional clear credential, the local educational agency shall, concurrently within 30 days of the assignment, provide all of the following to the substitute teacher:(A) Access to professional development opportunities.(B) An orientation training that includes, but is not limited to, classroom management, academic instructional strategies, and pupil and staff safety protocols.(C) Mentoring opportunities, including, but not limited to, a partnership with an experienced teacher or school administrator.(2) Local educational agencies may use existing trainings to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1).(f) (1) Local educational agencies shall, commencing with data from the 2026–27 school year, annually report to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing the number of assignments where a substitute teacher served for more than 20 cumulative days in a special education assignment or 30 cumulative days in any one assignment through the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System.(2) Reporting pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include a separate identification of placements where a substitute served due to a vacant teaching position where no teacher of record exists or due to a teacher leave where a teacher of record exists but is absent.(g) (1) This section does not constitute a change in existing law which provides that emergency credentialed substitute teachers serving in assignments beyond their authorized period or substitute teachers serving in vacant teaching positions are not considered properly assigned as described in Sections 33126, 35186, and 44258.9.(2) This section does not amend the definition of a vacant teacher position pursuant to Section 33126 or a teacher vacancy pursuant to Section 35186.(h) This section does not amend the requirements of a short-term staff permit, provisional internship permit, or teaching permit for statutory leave, as described in Sections 80021, 80021.1, and 80022, respectively, of Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Division 8 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(i) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.